pl: Odmiana oleju słonecznikowego: Wysokooleinowy; Wysokostearynowy wysokooleinowy; Linolowy; Średniooleinowy; Zwykły; Inne
es: Variedad de aceite de girasol: Alto oleico; Alto esteárico y alto oleico; Linoleico; Oleico medio; Regular; Otro
nl: Variëteit zonnebloemolie: High-oleic; High-stearic high-oleic; Linolzuur; Mid-oleic; Regulier; Overig
ja: ひまわり油の種類: ハイオレイック; ハイステアリック・ハイオレイック; リノール; ミッドオレイック; レギュラー; その他
ru: Сорт подсолнечного масла: Высокоолеиновое; Высокостеариновое и высокоолеиновое; Линолевое; Среднеолеиновое; Обычное; Другое
cs: Druh slunečnicového oleje: S vysokým obsahem kyseliny olejové; S vysokým obsahem kyseliny stearové a olejové; Linolový; Se středním obsahem kyseliny olejové; Běžný; Jiné
ko: 해바라기씨유 종류: 고올레산; 고스테아르산 고올레산; 리놀레산; 중올레산; 일반; 기타
nb: Solsikkeoljevariant: Høyoljesyre; Høyt innhold av stearin- og oljesyre; Linolsyre; Middels oljesyre; Vanlig; Annet
lt-LT: Saulėgrąžų aliejaus rūšis: Didelio oleino kiekio; Didelio stearino ir oleino kiekio; Linolo rūgšties; Vidutinio oleino kiekio; Įprastas; Kita
zh-TW: 葵花籽油種類: 高油酸; 高硬脂酸高油酸; 亞麻油酸; 中油酸; 一般; 其他
pt-BR: Variedade de óleo de girassol: Alto oleico; Alto esteárico alto oleico; Linoleico; Médio oleico; Normal; Outros
th: ประเภทของน้ำมันดอกทานตะวัน: โอเลอิกสูง; สเตียริกสูง โอเลอิกสูง; ไลโนเลอิก; โอเลอิกปานกลาง; แบบปกติ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta suncokretovog ulja: Visoko oleinsko; Visoko stearinsko visoko oleinsko; Linolensko; Srednje oleinsko; Standardno; Ostalo
el: Ποικιλία ηλιελαίου: Υψηλού ελαϊκού; Υψηλού στεατικού και ελαϊκού; Λινελαϊκό; Μεσαίου ελαϊκού; Κανονικό; Άλλο
fi: Auringonkukkaöljyn lajike: Korkea öljyhappo; Korkea steariini- ja öljyhappo; Linolihappo; Keskikorkea öljyhappo; Tavallinen; Muu
sk-SK: Druh slnečnicového oleja: S vysokým obsahom kyseliny olejovej; S vysokým obsahom kyseliny stearovej a olejovej; S obsahom kyseliny linolovej; So stredným obsahom kyseliny olejovej; Klasický; Iné
vi: Loại dầu hướng dương: Oleic cao; Stearic cao, oleic cao; Linoleic; Oleic trung bình; Thông thường; Khác
sv: Solrosoljesort: Hög oljesyrahalt; Hög stearinsyra och hög oljesyra; Linolsyra; Medelhög oljesyrahalt; Standard; Övrigt
hu: Napraforgóolaj változata: Magas olajsavas; Magas sztearinsav- és olajsavas; Linolsavas; Közepes olajsavas; Normál; Egyéb
pt-PT: Variedade de óleo de girassol: Alto teor oleico; Alto teor esteárico e alto teor oleico; Linoleico; Teor oleico médio; Normal; Outro
de: Auswahl an Sonnenblumenölen: High-Oleic; High-Stearic High-Oleic; Linolsäure; Mid-Oleic; Normal; Sonstige
it: Varietà di olio di girasole: Alto oleico; Alto stearico e alto oleico; Linoleico; Medio oleico; Normale; Altro
ro-RO: Sortiment de ulei de floarea-soarelui: Bogat în acid oleic; Bogat în acid stearic și oleic; Linoleic; Cu conținut mediu de acid oleic; Normal; Altele
en: Sunflower oil variety: High oleic; High stearic high oleic; Linoleic; Mid-oleic; Regular; Other
bg-BG: Сорт слънчогледово олио: Високоолеиново; Високостеариново високоолеиново; Линолово; Средноолеиново; Обикновено; Друго
sl-SI: Sorta sončničnega olja: Z visoko vsebnostjo oleinske kisline; Z visoko vsebnostjo stearinske in oleinske kisline; Linolno; Srednje visoka vsebnost oleinske kisline; Običajno; Drugo
da: Variant af solsikkeolie: Høj-oleinsyre; Højt indhold af stearinsyre og oliesyre; Med linolsyre; Mellemhøjt indhold af oliesyre; Almindelig; Andet
fr: Variété d'huile de tournesol: Riche en acide oléique; Riche en acides stéarique et oléique; Linoléique; Moyennement oléique; Classique; Autre
zh-CN: 葵花籽油品种: 高油酸; 高硬脂酸高油酸; 亚油酸; 中油酸; 常规; 其他
tr: Ayçiçek yağı çeşidi: Yüksek oleik asitli; Yüksek stearik yüksek oleik asitli; Linoleik; Orta oleik asitli; Normal; Diğer